Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4318.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1367.2 of Title 68, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. For the purpose of compensating the seller or vendor in
keeping sales tax records, filing reports, and remitting the tax
when due, a seller or vendor shall be allowed a deduction of one
percent (1%) of the tax due under the applicable provisions of Title
68 of the Oklahoma Statutes; provided, such deduction shall not be
allowed with respect to a direct payment permit.

Req. No. 14333 Page 1

B. No deductions from tax shall be allowed if the filing of a
report or payment of tax is filed after the due date; provided, the
deduction shall be allowed if the Oklahoma Tax Commission determines
that the delinquency was due to a natural disaster for which a
Presidential Major Disaster Declaration was issued.
C. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection A of this
section, the deduction provided by this section shall be limited to
a maximum of One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) per month per sales
tax account number.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1410.2 of Title 68, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
For the purpose of compensating the seller or vendor in keeping
use tax records, filing reports, and remitting the tax when due, a
seller or vendor shall be allowed a deduction equal to the amount
provided for under the Oklahoma Sales Tax Code.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-14333 AO 01/06/26





Req. No. 14333 Page 2